test.aff
SET UTF-8

#ბრუნება თანხმოვანფუძიანი + ხმოვანფუძიანი კვეცადი
SFX Y Y 16
SFX Y ი ი ი #თანხმოვანფუძიანი
SFX Y ი მა ი
SFX Y ი ს ი
SFX Y ი ის ი
SFX Y ი ით ი
SFX Y ი ად ი
SFX Y ი ო ი
SFX Y 0 0 [აე] #ხმოვანფუძიანი
SFX Y 0 მ [აე]
SFX Y 0 ს [აე]
SFX Y ა ის ა
SFX Y ა ით ა
SFX Y ე ის ე
SFX Y ე ით ე
SFX Y 0 დ [აე]
SFX Y 0 ვ [აე]

#ბრუნება ხმოვანფუძიანი უკვეცელი
SFX Z Y 7
SFX Z 0 0 [აეიოუ]
SFX Z 0 მ [აეიოუ]
SFX Z 0 ს [აეიოუ]
SFX Z 0 ს [აეიოუ]
SFX Z 0 თ [აეიოუ]
SFX Z 0 დ [აეიოუ]
SFX Z 0 ვ [აეიოუ]

#ბრუნება მრავლობითის შემდეგ
SFX U Y 7
SFX U 0 ი .
SFX U 0 მა .
SFX U 0 ს .
SFX U 0 ის .
SFX U 0 ით .
SFX U 0 ად .
SFX U 0 ო .

#მრავლობითი + ბრუნება
SFX X Y 5
SFX X ა ებ/U ა
SFX X 0 ებ/U ე
SFX X ი ებ/U ი
SFX X 0 ებ/U ო
SFX X 0 ებ/U უ
